Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 4. Required Annual Financial Disclosure.

Administrative Code. —

For legislative financial disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 5.

Sec. 24.60.200.
Financial disclosure by legislators, public members of the committee, and legislative directors.

A legislator, a public member of the committee, and a legislative director shall file a disclosure statement, under oath and on penalty of perjury, with the Alaska Public Offices Commission giving the following information about the income received or deferred income, earned or otherwise, to be received by the discloser, the discloser’s spouse or domestic partner, the discloser’s dependent children, and the discloser’s nondependent children who are living with the discloser:

the information that a public official is required to report under AS

39.50.030

, other than information about

income received as compensation for personal services;

a loan or loan guarantee;

gifts;

as to income or deferred income in excess of $1,000 earned or received as compensation for personal services, and as to dividend income or deferred compensation in excess of $1,000 received from a limited liability company as compensation or deferred compensation for personal services, a statement describing

the names and addresses of the source and the recipient;

the amount;

whether it was or will be earned by commission, by the job, by the hour, or by some other method;

the dates and approximate number of hours worked or to be worked to earn it; and

unless required by law to be kept confidential, a description sufficient to make clear to a person of ordinary understanding the nature of each service performed or to be performed and the date the service was performed or will be performed;

as to each loan or loan guarantee over $1,000 from a source with a substantial interest in legislative, administrative, or political action, the name and address of the person making the loan or guarantee, the amount of the loan, the terms and conditions under which the loan or guarantee was given, the amount outstanding at the time of filing, and whether or not a written loan agreement exists.

History.

(§ 31 ch 127 SLA 1992; am § 58 ch 74 SLA 1998; am §§ 30, 31 ch 108 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 155 SLA 2004; am § 5, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure 1; am § 43 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For legislative financial disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 5.

Sec. 24.60.210.
Deadlines for filing of disclosure statements.

A person required to file a disclosure statement under AS

24.60.200

shall file an annual report with the Alaska Public Offices Commission, covering the previous calendar year, containing the disclosures required by AS

24.60.200

, on or before March 15 of each year, except that a person appointed as a legislator under AS 15.40, a public member of the committee, or a legislative director must file within 30 days after the person’s appointment. In addition, a person subject to this subsection shall, within 90 days after leaving service as a legislator, legislative director, or public member of the committee, file a final report containing the disclosures required of the person by AS 24.60.200 for the period that begins on the last day of the last period for which the person filed a report required by that section and ends on the date of the person’s last day of service.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a public member and a public member nominee of the committee shall file an annual report with the Alaska Public Offices Commission, covering the previous calendar year, containing the disclosures required by AS

24.60.200

, on or before the second Monday in January of each year.

The Alaska Public Offices Commission shall require that the reports required under this section be submitted electronically but may, when circumstances warrant an exception, accept any information required under this section that is typed in clear and legible black typeface or hand-printed in dark ink on paper in a format approved by the commission or on forms provided by the commission and that is filed with the commission.

History.

(§ 31 ch 127 SLA 1992; am § 59 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 127 SLA 2002; am §§ 44, 45 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For legislative financial disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 5.

Sec. 24.60.220.
Administration of AS 24.60.200 — 24.60.260.

The Alaska Public Offices Commission shall

adopt regulations to implement and interpret the provisions of AS

24.60.200

—

24.60.260

;

prepare standardized forms on which the statements required by AS

24.60.200

shall be filed; and

examine, investigate, and compare all reports and statements required under AS

24.60.200

, and report all possible violations of this chapter it discovers to the committee.

History.

(§ 31 ch 127 SLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For legislative financial disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 5.

Sec. 24.60.230.
Statements as public records.

A statement filed with the Alaska Public Offices Commission under AS

24.60.200

is a public record. A person is not required to comply with AS

24.60.200

to the extent that a court of competent jurisdiction of the state determines that legally privileged professional relationships or constitutional privacy considerations would be violated by compliance.

History.

(§ 31 ch 127 SLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For legislative financial disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 5.

Sec. 24.60.240.
Civil penalty for late filing.

A person required to file a disclosure statement under AS

24.60.200

who fails to file a properly completed report under AS

24.60.200

is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $10 a day for each day the delinquency continues as the Alaska Public Offices Commission determines, subject to appeal to the superior court. An affidavit stating facts in mitigation may be submitted to the Alaska Public Offices Commission by the person against whom the civil penalty is assessed. However, the imposition of the penalties prescribed in this section does not excuse the person from filing reports required by AS 24.60.200.

History.

(§ 31 ch 127 SLA 1992; am § 60 ch 74 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For legislative financial disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 5.

Sec. 24.60.250.
Effect of failure to file.

In addition to the sanctions described in AS

24.60.260

, if the Alaska Public Offices Commission finds that a candidate for the legislature who is an incumbent legislator has failed to file a report under AS

24.60.200

by March 15, the commission shall notify the candidate that the report is late. If the candidate fails to file the report within 30 days after it is due,

the commission shall notify the lieutenant governor;

the candidate shall forfeit nomination to office and may not be seated in office;

the lieutenant governor may not certify the person’s nomination for office or election to office; and

nomination to the office shall be certified as provided in AS

39.50.060(b)

.

In addition to the sanctions described in AS

24.60.260

, if the Alaska Public Offices Commission finds that a member of the committee has failed or refused to file a report under AS

24.60.200

by a deadline established in AS

24.60.210

, it shall notify the presiding officer of the appropriate legislative body. In the case of a public member of the committee, the commission shall notify both presiding officers.

In addition to the sanctions described in AS

24.60.260

, if the Alaska Public Offices Commission finds that a legislative director has failed or refused to file a report under AS

24.60.200

by a deadline established in AS

24.60.210

, it shall notify the Alaska Legislative Council or the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee, as appropriate. For the ombudsman and the office of victims’ rights, the Alaska Legislative Council shall be notified.

History.

(§ 31 ch 127 SLA 1992; am § 14 ch 63 SLA 1998; am § 61 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 46 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For legislative financial disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 5.

Sec. 24.60.255.
Administrative complaints.

A person may file a written complaint alleging a violation of AS

24.60.200

—

24.60.260

has occurred or is occurring.

Complaints filed under (a) of this section must be filed within five years after the date of the alleged violation.

If a member of the Alaska Public Offices Commission files a complaint, that member of the commission may not participate in any proceeding of the commission relating to the complaint.

History.

(§ 9 ch 95 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For initiation of a false complaint as a crime, see AS

11.56.805

.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 13(f), ch. 95, SLA 2008, provides that this section “applies to complaints alleging violations of AS

24.60.200

—

24.60.260

that occur on or after January 1, 2009.”

Sec. 24.60.260.
Prohibited conduct relating to disclosures; penalties.

A person required to make a disclosure under this chapter may not knowingly make a false or deliberately misleading or incomplete disclosure to the committee or to the Alaska Public Offices Commission. A person who files a disclosure after a deadline set by this chapter or by a regulation adopted by the Alaska Public Offices Commission has violated this chapter and may be subject to imposition of a fine as provided in (c) of this section or AS

24.60.240

.

A person who violates this section is subject to a proceeding under AS

24.60.170

, in addition to penalties that may be imposed by the Alaska Public Offices Commission under AS

24.60.240

and to the penalty set out in AS

24.60.250

.

The committee may impose a fine on a person who files a disclosure after a deadline set by this chapter. The amount of the fine imposed under this subsection may not exceed $2 for each day to a maximum of $100 for each late filing unless the committee determines that the late filing was inadvertent or wilful. If the committee finds that a late filing was inadvertent, the maximum fine the committee may impose under this subsection is $25. If the committee determines that the late filing was wilful, the amount of the fine imposed under this subsection may be $100 for each day but may not exceed a maximum of $2,500.

History.

(§ 31 ch 127 SLA 1992; am §§ 62, 63 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 6 ch 94 SLA 2008; am § 16 ch 45 SLA 2012)

Administrative Code. —

For legislative financial disclosure, see 2 AAC 50, art. 5.